Massachusetts, session 194th, H5478.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. For purposes of this act, “licensed establishment” shall mean an
establishment holding a license for the sale of alcoholic beverages, whether all alcohol or wines
and malt only, to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of chapter 138 of the General
Laws.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and subject to
section 5, a local licensing authority in a city or town may, on a temporary basis not to begin
prior to June 8, 2026, allow a licensed establishment to sell alcoholic beverages for off-premises
consumption in districts designated pursuant to section 4. Only licensed establishments located
of 2

within a district designated pursuant to said section 4 may sell alcoholic beverages to be
consumed within the district.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and subject to
section 5, a licensed establishment may, subject to approval of the local licensing authority, sell
alcoholic beverages on-premises for 1 additional hour beyond the time set forth in the
establishment’s license, but not to exceed 3:00 a.m. for the period of June 8, 2026 until July 31,
2026, subject to any applicable local rules or regulations and any conditions placed upon its
license.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and subject to
section 5, a local licensing authority may designate 1 or more areas in that city or town in which
alcoholic beverages are permitted to be consumed in public spaces, subject to such restrictions as
the city or town may deem appropriate and only for the period of June 8, 2026 until July 31,
2026. Alcohol consumed within a designated district shall be limited to alcoholic beverages sold
by participating licensed establishments located within the designated district.
SECTION 5. Nothing in this act shall permit a licensed establishment to sell any type or
category of alcohol beyond the type or category of alcohol that the licensed establishment is
permitted to sell under the license issued to it by the local licensing authority pursuant to section
12 of chapter 138 of the General Laws.
SECTION 6. This act shall expire on July 31, 2026.
of 2